WaNoun.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
WaStem;

LEXICON WaStem

ගැටලු WaNoun;
සංඛ්‍යා WaNoun;
හේතු WaNoun;
ආණ්ඩු WaNoun;
 අවස්ථා WaNoun;
දෙපාර්තමේන්තු WaNoun;
පුටු WaNoun;
තරු WaNoun;

LEXICON WaNoun
+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ව #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:වට #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:වක #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:වකට #;
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:වන් #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:වන්ට #;
+N+Voc+Sg+Anim:වේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:වේත් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:වක් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:වම #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:වත් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:වවත් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:වල #;
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim: #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:වලට #
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:වලින් #
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:වල්වලින් #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:වල්වල #;
